Utah statutes.
78B-1-129.   Witnesses -- Subpoena defined.

The process by which the attendance of a witness is required is a subpoena.  It is a writ or order directed to a person and requiring the person's attendance at a particular time and place to testify as a witness.  The person may also be required to bring any books, documents, or other things under the person's control which is required to be produced in evidence.

